Missouri, session 2026, SB1317.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 456.1-103, 475.010, 475.050, 475.055,
475.060, 475.075, 475.079, and 475.120, RSMo, are repealed and
eight new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 456.1-103, 475.010, 475.050, 475.055, 475.060,
475.075, 475.079, and 475.120, to read as follows:
456.1-103. In sections 456.1-101 to 456.11-1106, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Action", with respect to an act of a trustee,
includes a failure to act;
(2) "Ascertainable standard", a standard relating to
an individual's health, education, support, or maintenance
within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or Section
2541(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(3) "Beneficiary", a person that:
(a) Has a present or future beneficial interest in a
trust, vested or contingent; or
(b) In a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a
power of appointment over trust property;
(4) "Charitable trust", a trust, or portion of a
trust, created for a charitable purpose described in
subsection 1 of section 456.4-405;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1317 2
(5) "Conservator", a person described in subdivision
(3) of section 475.010. This term does not include a
conservator ad litem;
(6) "Conservator ad litem", a person appointed by the
court pursuant to the provisions of section 475.097;
(7) "Directed trust", any trust, including a split
interest trust, in which the trust instrument:
(a) Authorizes a trust protector to instruct or direct
the trustee;
(b) Charges a trust protector with any
responsibilities regarding the trust;
(c) Grants the trust protector one or more powers over
the trust; or
(d) Directs one or more powers over the trust to a
person, who is not serving as a trustee, and is not a
settlor or a beneficiary;
(8) "Environmental law", a federal, state, or local
law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection
of the environment;
(9) "Financial institution", a non-foreign bank,
savings and loan or trust company chartered, regulated and
supervised by the Missouri division of finance, the office
of the comptroller of the currency, the office of thrift
supervision, the National Credit Union Administration, or
the Missouri division of credit union supervision. The term
"non-foreign bank" shall mean a bank that is not a foreign
bank within the meaning of subdivision (1) of section
361.005;
(10) "Guardian", a person described in subdivision
[(8)] (9) of section 475.010. The term does not include a
guardian ad litem;

SB 1317 3
(11) "Interested persons", include beneficiaries and
any others having a property right in or claim against a
trust estate which may be affected by a judicial
proceeding. It also includes fiduciaries and other persons
representing interested persons. The meaning as it relates
to particular persons may vary from time to time and must be
determined according to the particular purposes of, and
matter involved in, any proceeding;
(12) "Interests of the beneficiaries", the beneficial
interests provided in the terms of the trust;
(13) "Internal Revenue Code", the United States
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on January 1,
2005, or as later amended;
(14) "Jurisdiction", with respect to a geographic
area, includes a state or country;
(15) "Person", an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, government;
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public
corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity;
(16) "Permissible distributee", a beneficiary who is
currently eligible to receive distributions of trust income
or principal, whether mandatory or discretionary;
(17) "Power of withdrawal", a presently exercisable
power of a beneficiary to withdraw assets from the trust
without the consent of the trustee or any other person;
(18) "Principal place of administration", of a trust
is the trustee's usual place of business where the records
pertaining to the trust are kept, or the trustee's residence
if the trustee has no such place of business, unless
otherwise designated by the terms of the trust as provided
in section 456.1-108. In the case of cotrustees, the

SB 1317 4
principal place of administration is, in the following order
of priority:
(a) The usual place of business of the corporate
trustee if there is but one corporate cotrustee;
(b) The usual place of business or residence of the
trustee who is a professional fiduciary if there is but one
such trustee and no corporate cotrustee; or
(c) The usual place of business or residence of any of
the cotrustees;
(19) "Professional fiduciary", an individual who
represents himself or herself to the public as having
specialized training, experience or skills in the
administration of trusts;
(20) "Property", anything that may be the subject of
ownership, whether real or personal, legal or equitable, or
any interest therein;
(21) "Qualified beneficiary", a beneficiary who, on
the date the beneficiary's qualification is determined:
(a) Is a permissible distributee;
(b) Would be a permissible distributee if the
100 interests of the permissible distributees described in
101 paragraph (a) of this subdivision terminated on that date; or
102 (c) Would be a permissible distributee if the trust
103 terminated on that date;
104 (22) "Record", information that is inscribed on a
105 tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
106 medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;
107 (23) "Revocable", as applied to a trust, means that
108 the settlor has the legal power to revoke the trust without
109 the consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse
110 interest, regardless of whether the settlor has the mental
111 capacity to do so in fact;

SB 1317 5
112 (24) "Settlor", a person, including a testator, who
113 creates, or contributes property to, a trust. If more than
114 one person creates or contributes property to a trust, each
115 person is a settlor of the portion of the trust property
116 attributable to that person's contribution except to the
117 extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw
118 that portion pursuant to the terms of the trust;
119 (25) "Sign", with present intent to authenticate or
120 adopt a record:
121 (a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
122 (b) To attach to or logically associate with the
123 record an electronic sound, symbol, or process;
124 (26) "Spendthrift provision", a term of a trust which
125 restrains either the voluntary or involuntary transfer or
126 both the voluntary and involuntary transfer of a
127 beneficiary's interest;
128 (27) "State", a state of the United States, the
129 District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
130 Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
131 the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an
132 Indian tribe or band recognized by federal law or formally
133 acknowledged by a state;
134 (28) "Terms of a trust", the manifestation of the
135 settlor's intent regarding a trust's provisions as expressed
136 in the trust instrument or as may be established by other
137 evidence that would be admissible in a judicial proceeding;
138 (29) "Trust instrument", an instrument executed by the
139 settlor that contains terms of the trust, including any
140 amendments thereto;
141 (30) "Trust protector", any person, group of persons,
142 or entity not serving as a trustee and not the settlor or a
143 beneficiary, designated in a trust instrument to instruct or

SB 1317 6
144 direct the trustee or charged in the trust instrument with
145 any responsibilities regarding the trust or expressly
146 granted in the trust instrument one or more powers over the
147 trust. The term trust protector includes, but is not
148 limited to, persons or entities identified in the trust
149 instrument as trust advisors, trust directors, distribution
150 advisors, or investment advisors;
151 (31) "Trustee", includes an original, additional, and
152 successor trustee, and a cotrustee.
475.010. When used in this chapter, unless otherwise
apparent from the context, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adult", a person who has reached the age of
eighteen years;
(2) "Claims", liabilities of the protectee arising in
contract, in tort or otherwise, before or after the
appointment of a conservator, and liabilities of the estate
which arise at or after the adjudication of disability or
after the appointment of a conservator of the estate,
including expenses of the adjudication and of
administration. The term does not include demands or
disputes regarding title of the protectee to specific assets
alleged to be included in the estate;
(3) "Conservator", one appointed by a court to have
the care and custody of the estate of a minor or a disabled
person. A "limited conservator" is one whose duties or
powers are limited. The term "conservator", as used in this
chapter, includes limited conservator unless otherwise
specified or apparent from the context;
(4) "Conservator ad litem", one appointed by the court
in which particular litigation is pending regarding the
management of financial resources on behalf of a minor, a

SB 1317 7
disabled person, or an unborn person in that particular
proceeding or as otherwise specified in this chapter;
(5) "Custodial parent", the parent of a minor who has
been awarded sole or joint physical custody of such minor,
or the parent of an incapacitated person who has been
appointed as guardian of such person, by an order or
judgment of a court of this state or of another state or
territory of the United States, or if there is no such order
or judgment, the parent with whom the minor or incapacitated
person primarily resides;
(6) "Disabled" or "disabled person", one who is:
(a) Unable by reason of any physical, mental, or
cognitive condition to receive and evaluate information or
to communicate decisions to such an extent that the person
lacks ability to manage the person's financial resources; or
(b) The term disabled or disabled person, as used in
this chapter includes the terms partially disabled or
partially disabled person unless otherwise specified or
apparent from the context;
(7) "Eligible person" or "qualified person", a natural
person, social service agency, corporation or national or
state banking organization qualified to act as guardian of
the person or conservator of the estate pursuant to the
provisions of section 475.055;
(8) "Forensic guardianship", a guardianship in which
the division of probation and parole within the department
of corrections is appointed as a guardian pursuant to the
provisions of section 475.055;
(9) "Guardian", one appointed by a court to have the
care and custody of the person of a minor or of an
incapacitated person. A "limited guardian" is one whose
duties or powers are limited. A "standby guardian" is one

SB 1317 8
approved by the court to temporarily assume the duties of
guardian of a minor or of an incapacitated person under
section 475.046. The term guardian, as used in this
chapter, includes limited guardian and standby guardian
unless otherwise specified or apparent from the context;
[(9)] (10) "Guardian ad litem", one appointed by a
court, in which particular litigation is pending on behalf
of a minor, an incapacitated person, a disabled person, or
an unborn person in that particular proceeding or as
otherwise specified in this code;
[(10)] (11) "Habilitation", a process of treatment,
training, care, or specialized attention that seeks to
enhance and maximize the ability of a person with an
intellectual disability or a developmental disability to
cope with the environment and to live as determined by the
person as much as possible, as is appropriate for the person
considering his or her physical and mental condition and
financial means ;
[(11)] (12) "Incapacitated person", one who is unable
by reason of any physical, mental, or cognitive condition to
receive and evaluate information or to communicate decisions
to such an extent that the person, even with appropriate
services and assistive technology, lacks capacity to manage
the person's essential requirements for food, clothing,
shelter, safety or other care such that serious physical
injury, illness, or disease is likely to occur. The term
incapacitated person as used in this chapter includes the
term partially incapacitated person unless otherwise
specified or apparent from the context;
[(12)] (13) "Interested persons", spouses, children,
parents, adult members of a ward's or protectee's family,
creditors or any others having a property right or claim

SB 1317 9
against the estate of a protectee being administered,
trustees of a trust of which the ward or protectee is a
beneficiary, agents of a durable power of attorney for a
ward or protectee, and children of a protectee who may have
a property right or claim against or an interest in the
estate of a protectee. This meaning may vary at different
stages and different parts of a proceeding and shall be
determined according to the particular purpose and matter
involved;
[(13)] (14) "Least restrictive alternative", with
respect to the guardianship order and the exercise of power
by the guardian , a course of action or an alternative that
allows the incapacitated person to live, learn, and work
100 with minimum restrictions on the person, as are appropriate
101 for the person considering his or her physical and mental
102 condition and financial means. Least restrictive
103 alternative also means choosing the decision or approach
104 that:
105 (a) Places the least possible restriction on the
106 person's personal liberty and exercise of rights and that
107 promotes the greatest possible inclusion of the person into
108 his or her community, as is appropriate for the person
109 considering his or her physical and mental condition and
110 financial means; and
111 (b) Is consistent with meeting the person's essential
112 requirements for health, safety, habilitation, treatment,
113 and recovery and protecting the person from abuse, neglect,
114 and financial exploitation;
115 [(14)] (15) "Manage financial resources", either those
116 actions necessary to obtain, administer, and dispose of real
117 and personal property, intangible property, business
118 property, benefits, income or any assets, or those actions

SB 1317 10
119 necessary to prevent waste, loss or dissipation of property,
120 or those actions necessary to provide for the care and
121 support of such person or anyone legally dependent upon such
122 person by a person of ordinary skills and intelligence
123 commensurate with his or her training and education;
124 [(15)] (16) "Minor", any person who is under the age
125 of eighteen years;
126 [(16)] (17) "Parent", the biological or adoptive
127 mother or father of a child whose parental rights have not
128 been terminated under chapter 211, including:
129 (a) A person registered as the father of the child by
130 reason of an unrevoked notice of intent to claim paternity
131 under section 192.016;
132 (b) A person who has acknowledged paternity of the
133 child and has not rescinded that acknowledgment under
134 section 193.215; and
135 (c) A person presumed to be the natural father of the
136 child under section 210.822;
137 [(17)] (18) "Partially disabled person", one who is
138 unable by reason of any physical, mental, or cognitive
139 condition to receive and evaluate information or to
140 communicate decisions to such an extent that such person
141 lacks capacity to manage, in part, his or her financial
142 resources;
143 [(18)] (19) "Partially incapacitated person", one who
144 is unable by reason of any physical, mental, or cognitive
145 condition to receive and evaluate information or to
146 communicate decisions to the extent that such person lacks
147 capacity to meet, in part, essential requirements for food,
148 clothing, shelter, safety, or other care without court-
149 ordered assistance;

SB 1317 11
150 [(19)] (20) "Protectee", a person for whose estate a
151 conservator or limited conservator has been appointed or
152 with respect to whose estate a transaction has been
153 authorized by the court under section 475.092 without
154 appointment of a conservator or limited conservator;
155 [(20)] (21) "Seriously ill", a significant likelihood
156 that a person will become incapacitated or die within twelve
157 months;
158 [(21)] (22) "Social service agency", a charitable
159 organization organized and incorporated as a not-for-profit
160 corporation under the laws of this state and which qualifies
161 as an exempt organization within the meaning of Section
162 501(c)(3), or any successor provision thereto of the federal
163 Internal Revenue Code;
164 [(22)] (23) "Standby guardian", one who is authorized
165 to have the temporary care and custody of the person of a
166 minor or of an incapacitated person under the provisions of
167 section 475.046;
168 [(23)] (24) "Treatment", the prevention, amelioration
169 or cure of a person's physical and mental illnesses or
170 incapacities;
171 [(24)] (25) "Ward", a minor or an incapacitated person
172 for whom a guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian
173 has been appointed.
475.050. 1. Before appointing any other eligible
person as guardian of an incapacitated person, or
conservator of a disabled person, the court shall consider
the suitability of appointing any of the following persons,
listed in the order of priority, who appear to be willing to
serve:
(1) If the incapacitated or disabled person is, at the
time of the hearing, able to make and communicate a

SB 1317 12
reasonable choice, any eligible person nominated by the
person;
(2) Any eligible person nominated in a durable power
of attorney executed by the incapacitated or disabled
person, or in an instrument in writing signed by the
incapacitated or disabled person and by two witnesses who
signed at the incapacitated or disabled person's request,
before the inception of the person's incapacity or
disability;
(3) The spouse, parents, adult children, adult
brothers and sisters and other close adult relatives of the
incapacitated or disabled person;
(4) Any other eligible person or, with respect to the
estate only, any eligible organization or corporation,
nominated in a duly probated will of such a spouse or
relative.
2. The court shall not appoint an unrelated third
party as a guardian or conservator unless there is no
relative suitable and willing to serve or if the appointment
of a relative or nominee is otherwise contrary to the best
interests of the incapacitated or disabled person. If the
incapacitated or disabled person is a minor under the care
of the children's division and is entering adult
guardianship or conservatorship, it shall be a rebuttable
presumption that he or she has no relative suitable and
willing to serve as guardian or conservator.
3. Except for good cause shown, the court shall make
its appointment in accordance with the incapacitated or
disabled person's most recent valid nomination of an
eligible person qualified to serve as guardian of the person
or conservator of the estate.

SB 1317 13
4. Except for those individuals specified in
subdivisions (1) [and (2)] to (3) of this subsection, the
court shall require all guardians and conservators who are
seeking appointment and who have a fiduciary responsibility
to a ward, an incapacitated person, or a disabled person to
submit at their own expense to a background screening that
shall include the disqualification lists of the departments
of mental health, social services, and health and senior
services; the abuse and neglect registries for adults and
children; a Missouri criminal record review; and the sexual
offender registry. Individuals seeking appointment as a
conservator shall also submit, at their own expense, to a
credit history investigation. The nominated guardian or
conservator shall file the results of the reports with the
court at least ten days prior to the appointment hearing
date unless waived or modified by the court for good cause
shown by an affidavit filed simultaneously with the petition
for appointment or in the event the protected person
requests an expedited hearing. The provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to:
(1) Public administrators; [or]
(2) Employees of the division of probation and parole
who serve as guardians on behalf of the division of
probation and parole in a forensic guardianship under
section 475.079; or
(3) The ward's, incapacitated person's, or disabled
person's spouse, parents, children who have reached eighteen
years of age, or siblings who have reached eighteen years of
age.
5. Guardians certified by a national accrediting
organization may file proof of certification in lieu of the
requirements of subsections 4 and 6 of this section.

SB 1317 14
6. An order appointing a guardian or conservator shall
not be signed by the judge until such reports have been
filed with the court and reviewed by the judge, who shall
consider the reports in determining whether to appoint a
guardian or conservator. Such reports, or lack thereof,
shall be certified either by an affidavit or by obtaining a
certified copy of the reports. No reports or national
criminal history record check shall be required by the court
upon the application of a petitioner for an emergency
temporary guardianship or emergency temporary
conservatorship. The court may waive the requirements of
this subsection for good cause shown. If appointed, a
guardian or conservator may petition the court for
reimbursement of the reasonable expenses of the credit
history investigation and background screenings.
475.055. 1. Except as herein otherwise provided:
(1) Any adult person may be appointed guardian of the
person or conservator of the estate, or both, of a minor or
incapacitated or disabled person, except that a parent shall
not be denied appointment as guardian of the person of a
minor for the reason that the parent is a minor;
(2) Any charitable organization organized and
incorporated as a not-for-profit corporation under the laws
of this state prior to January 1, 1902, shall be qualified
to continue to serve as guardian of the person of any ward
for whom such charitable organization has been appointed
guardian of the person prior to September 28, 1983, or to be
appointed guardian of the person or persons adjudicated
incapacitated subsequent to September 28, 1983;
(3) Any social service agency located within a county
of the first classification or within a city not within a
county except any county of the first classification without

SB 1317 15
a charter form of government with a population of one
hundred thousand or more inhabitants which contains all or
part of a city with a population of three hundred fifty
thousand or more inhabitants, which is found capable by the
court of providing an active and suitable program of
guardianship for the incapacitated person, taking into
consideration the nature of such person's disability and the
nature of such organization's services, may be appointed as
guardian of the person; however, no social service agency
shall be appointed as guardian of the person under this
subdivision unless it employs a licensed professional found
by the court to have sufficient expertise to meet the needs
of the ward, and it is found by the court that such
professional shall have primary responsibility for providing
guardianship services to the incapacitated person for which
such social service agency is appointed guardian. The court
shall not appoint as guardian of the person under this
subdivision a social service agency which is providing
residential services to the ward;
(4) Any corporation authorized to do business in this
state and empowered by its charter so to act or any national
banking association authorized so to act in this state may
be appointed conservator of the estate of a minor or
disabled person. No corporation other than a social service
agency may be appointed to serve as guardian of the
incapacitated person;
(5) (a) The division of probation and parole within
the department of corrections may be appointed as a guardian
to an incapacitated person who is found by a court of
competent jurisdiction to:
a. Have a substantial criminal history of serious
offenses;

SB 1317 16
b. Be under supervised or unsupervised probation or
parole;
c. Be under a court order requiring or prohibiting a
specified act;
d. Be required to register as a sex offender pursuant
to sections 589.400 to 589.425;
e. Have a likelihood of serious harm, as such term is
defined in section 632.005, to himself, herself, or others
or is likely to commit an offense or violate any term or
condition of the incapacitated person's probation or parole
or any other court order that the incapacitated person is
under;
f. Have a substance use disorder, as such term is
defined in section 478.001, and where such substance use
disorder results in the total or partial incapacity at issue
or significant incapacitation from alcohol or drugs; or
g. Have significant interaction with law enforcement
officers, as such term is defined in section 556.061.
(b) The division of probation and parole appointed as
a guardian under this subdivision shall have the same rights
and duties as a public administrator appointed as a guardian.
(c) The incapacitated person shall not be committed or
incarcerated in any government or privately operated
institution, facility, jail, prison, program, housing, or
mental health or psychiatric unit solely on the basis of
being in a forensic guardianship, and the incapacitated
person shall not be denied participation in and the benefits
from any government or privately operated institution,
facility, program, housing, or unit solely on the basis of
being in a forensic guardianship unless otherwise prohibited
by a clearly established state or federal law, rule, or
regulation or any term or condition of probation, parole,

SB 1317 17
court order, or rule of any jail or prison work release
program.
2. No person or corporation, other than the public
administrator of the county and the division of probation
and parole, shall be appointed guardian or conservator
unless the appointee has filed a consent to act. Except as
otherwise provided by this section, no person or corporation
licensed as a facility by the Missouri department of mental
health or the Missouri department of social services, nor
any administrator, owner, operator, manager or employee of
such a facility shall be appointed guardian of the person or
conservator of the estate of any resident of that facility,
unless related within the fourth degree of consanguinity or
affinity to the resident. No full-time judge of any court
of this state and no clerk, deputy clerk or division clerk
shall be appointed as guardian of the person or conservator
of the estate, but a judge, clerk, deputy clerk or division
clerk may serve as a guardian or conservator for a ward or
100 protectee who is a spouse or is within the third degree of
101 relationship by consanguinity or affinity as calculated
102 according to civil law. No natural person under eighteen
103 years of age, other than as provided in subsection 1 of this
104 section, no incapacitated or disabled person, and no
105 habitual drunkard shall be appointed guardian of the person
106 or conservator of the estate. No person whose letters of
107 guardianship or conservatorship are revoked shall be
108 appointed guardian or conservator within two years after the
109 revocation. No one shall be appointed guardian of the
110 person or conservator of the estate unless qualified to
111 perform the duties of said office or offices.
112 3. A person becomes a guardian or conservator of a
113 minor or incapacitated or disabled person upon issuance of

SB 1317 18
114 letters of guardianship or conservatorship by the court. A
115 person so appointed need not reside within this state in
116 order to accept or serve as guardian or conservator, unless
117 the court finds that such person, taking into consideration
118 his place of residence, is unable to effectively perform the
119 duties of guardian or conservator as provided by this code.
120 The guardianship or conservatorship status continues until
121 terminated, without regard to the location from time to
122 time, whether within or outside of this state, of the
123 guardian and ward or conservator and protectee.
124 4. Subsections 3 and 4 of section 473.117, section
125 473.689, and section 475.338 are applicable to nonresident
126 guardians and conservators.
127 5. If a social service agency is appointed to act as
128 guardian under this section, any other eligible person
129 listed in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 475.050
130 may petition the court to have the social service agency
131 removed as guardian. The court shall grant the petition if
132 it finds that the petitioner is qualified and will act in
133 the best interests of the disabled or incapacitated person.
134 The removal of a social service agency under such
135 circumstances does not require evidence that the agency
136 committed acts of misfeasance warranting the agency's
137 removal pursuant to section 475.110.
138 6. A social service agency acting as a guardian
139 pursuant to subdivision (4) of subsection 1 of this section
140 may only authorize the withholding or withdrawal of
141 artificially provided nutrition or hydration as prescribed
142 under section 404.820.
475.060. 1. Any person may file a petition for the
appointment of himself or herself or some other qualified
person as guardian of a minor. Such petition shall state:

SB 1317 19
(1) The name, age, domicile, actual place of residence
and post office address of the minor if known and if any of
these facts is unknown, the efforts made to ascertain that
fact;
(2) The estimated value of the minor's real and
personal property, and the location and value of any real
property owned by the minor outside of this state;
(3) If the minor has no domicile or place of residence
in this state, the county in which the property or major
part thereof of the minor is located;
(4) The name and address of the parents of the minor
and whether they are living or dead;
(5) The name and address of the spouse, and the names,
ages and addresses of all living children of the minor;
(6) The name and address of the person having custody
of the person of the minor or who claims to have custody of
the person of the minor;
(7) The name and address of any guardian of the person
or conservator of the estate of the minor appointed in this
or any other state;
(8) If appointment is sought for a natural person,
other than the public administrator, the names and addresses
of wards and disabled persons for whom such person is
already guardian or conservator;
(9) The name and address of the trustees and the
purpose of any trust of which the minor is a qualified
beneficiary;
(10) The reasons why the appointment of a guardian is
sought;
(11) A petition for the appointment of a guardian of a
minor may be filed for the sole and specific purpose of
school registration or medical insurance coverage. Such a

SB 1317 20
petition shall clearly set out this limited request and
shall not be combined with a petition for conservatorship;
(12) If the petitioner requests the appointment of co-
guardians, a statement of the reasons why such appointment
is sought and whether the petitioner requests that the co-
guardians, if appointed, may act independently or whether
they may act only together or only together with regard to
specified matters;
(13) That written consent has been obtained from any
person, including a public administrator, who is to be
appointed as a co-guardian; and
(14) Whether the petitioner knows of any other court
having jurisdiction over the minor and the name of the
court, if known.
2. Any person may file a petition for the appointment
of himself or herself or some other qualified person as
guardian or limited guardian of an incapacitated person.
Such petition shall state:
(1) If known, the name, age, domicile, actual place of
residence, and post office address of the alleged
incapacitated person, and for the period of three years
before the filing of the petition, the most recent
addresses, up to three, at which the alleged incapacitated
person lived prior to the most recent address, and if any of
these facts is unknown, the efforts made to ascertain that
fact. In the case of a petition filed by a public official
in his or her official capacity, the information required by
this subdivision need only be supplied to the extent it is
reasonably available to the petitioner;
(2) The estimated value of the alleged incapacitated
person's real and personal property, and the location and

SB 1317 21
value of any real property owned by the alleged
incapacitated person outside of this state;
(3) If the alleged incapacitated person has no
domicile or place of residence in this state, the county in
which the property or major part thereof of the alleged
incapacitated person is located;
(4) The name and address of the parents of the alleged
incapacitated person and whether they are living or dead;
(5) The name and address of the spouse, the names,
ages, and addresses of all living children of the alleged
incapacitated person, the names and addresses of the alleged
incapacitated person's closest known relatives, and the
names and relationship, if known, of any adults living with
the alleged incapacitated person; if no spouse, adult child,
or parent is listed, the names and addresses of the siblings
and children of deceased siblings of the alleged
incapacitated person; the name and address of any agent
appointed by the alleged incapacitated person in any durable
power of attorney, and of the presently acting trustees of
any trust of which the alleged incapacitated person is the
grantor or is a qualified beneficiary or is or was the
trustee or cotrustee and the purpose of the power of
attorney or trust;
(6) The name and address of the person having custody
of the person of the alleged incapacitated person;
(7) The name and address of any guardian of the person
or conservator of the estate of the alleged incapacitated
person appointed in this or any other state;
(8) If appointment is sought for a natural person,
other than the public administrator, the names and addresses
of wards and protectees for whom such person is already
guardian or conservator;

SB 1317 22
(9) The factual basis for the petitioner's conclusion
100 that the person for whom guardianship is sought is unable or
101 partially unable by reason of some specified physical,
102 mental, or cognitive condition to receive and evaluate
103 information or to communicate decisions to such an extent
104 that the person lacks capacity to meet essential
105 requirements for food, clothing, shelter, safety, or other
106 care such that serious physical injury, illness, or disease
107 is likely to occur;
108 (10) The reasons, incidents, and specific behaviors
109 demonstrating why the appointment of a guardian or limited
110 guardian is sought;
111 (11) If the petitioner suggests the appointment of co-
112 guardians, a statement of the reasons why such appointment
113 is sought and whether the petitioner suggests that the co-
114 guardians, if appointed, may act independently or whether
115 they may act only together or only together with regard to
116 specified matters; and
117 (12) Written consent has been obtained from any
118 person, including a public administrator, who is to be
119 appointed as a co-guardian.
120 3. If the person filing the petition seeks the
121 appointment of an emergency guardian, the petition shall
122 include the same requirements as provided in subsection 1 of
123 this section and shall request the appointment per the
124 requirements provided in subsection [15] 16 of section
125 475.075.
475.075. 1. Except as otherwise provided in section
475.062, when a petition for the appointment of a guardian
ad litem, guardian, or conservator for any potential ward or
protectee, who is then referred to as the respondent, is
filed under this chapter on grounds other than minority, the

SB 1317 23
court, if satisfied that there is good cause for the
exercise of its authority, shall promptly set the petition
for hearing.
2. The respondent shall be served in person with the
following: A copy of the petition; a written notice stating
the time and place the proceeding will be heard by the
court, the name and address of appointed counsel, and the
names and addresses of the witnesses who may be called to
testify in support of the petition; and with a copy of the
respondent's rights as set forth in subsections [9 and] 10
and 11 of this section. The notice shall be signed by the
judge or clerk of the court and served in person on the
respondent a reasonable time before the date set for the
hearing. A written notice stating the time and place for
the petition to be heard by the court, and the name and
address of counsel appointed to represent the respondent
shall be served upon the spouse, parents, children who have
reached the age of eighteen, any person serving as the
respondent's guardian, conservator, limited guardian, or
limited conservator, any person proposed to serve as
guardian or conservator, any person having power to act in a
fiduciary capacity with respect to any of the respondent's
financial resources, any person having the respondent's care
and custody known to the petitioner, and any co-tenants or
co-depositors with the respondent. Each person so listed
shall be served in any manner permitted by section 472.100.
If no such spouse, parent, or child is known, notice shall
be given to at least one of the respondent's closest
relatives who have reached eighteen years of age.
3. If the public administrator is nominated as
guardian or conservator or at any stage of the proceeding is
being considered by the court to be nominated as guardian or

SB 1317 24
conservator, the public administrator shall receive a copy
of the petition from the petitioner or the court and any
accompanying documents, including exhibits and medical
opinions, receive written notice indicating the date and
time of the proceeding, and have an opportunity to attend
and be heard.
4. If the division of probation and parole is
nominated to serve as guardian in a forensic guardianship or
at any stage of the proceeding is being considered by the
court to be nominated as guardian in a forensic
guardianship, the division of probation and parole shall
receive a copy of the petition from the petitioner or the
court and any accompanying documents, including exhibits and
medical opinions, receive written notice indicating the date
and time of the proceeding, and have an opportunity to
attend and be heard.
5. Upon the filing of a petition under the provisions
of subsection 1 of this section or for the approval on
behalf of the respondent of a transaction pursuant to
section 475.092 or for the rendition of emergency medical
treatment under the provisions of section 475.123, the court
shall immediately appoint an attorney to represent the
respondent in the proceeding. The attorney shall visit the
respondent at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing
unless the court finds good cause for waiving this
requirement. If the attorney finds that the respondent is
capable of understanding the matter in question or of
contributing to the advancement of the respondent's
interest, the attorney shall obtain from the respondent all
possible aid. If the attorney finds that the respondent is
so impaired that the respondent cannot communicate or
participate in the proceedings, the attorney shall consider

SB 1317 25
all circumstances then prevailing and act with care to
safeguard and advance the interests of the respondent.
[5.] 6. If the court enters an order appointing an
attorney for the respondent, it shall specify that the
attorney shall have the right to obtain all medical and
financial information of the respondent from medical care
providers and financial institutions, and no medical care
provider or financial institution shall be liable for
damages or otherwise for the release of this information to
the attorney appointed for the respondent. The court shall
allow a reasonable attorney's fee for the services rendered,
to be taxed as costs of the proceeding. Upon entry of
appearance by private counsel on behalf of the respondent,
the court may permit the court-appointed attorney to
withdraw only if after a hearing the court finds cause to
permit the withdrawal. The private counsel shall meet the
requirements of the court-appointed attorney in representing
the respondent as provided in subsection [4] 5 of this
section. The respondent's attorney shall not also serve as
guardian ad litem or conservator ad litem for the respondent
unless and until a judgment granting guardianship,
conservatorship, limited guardianship, or limited
conservatorship has been entered by the court. If the
attorney for the respondent has filed or intends to file an
appeal of such judgment, the attorney for the respondent
shall not serve as guardian ad litem or conservator ad litem
for the respondent until all proceedings in connection with
such appeal have been finally resolved. The petitioner
shall not nominate an attorney for the respondent.
[6.] 7. The court may direct that the respondent be
100 examined by a physician, licensed psychologist, or other
101 appropriate professional if the other professional has

SB 1317 26
102 experience or training in the alleged mental, physical, or
103 cognitive impairment. The court-appointed physician,
104 licensed psychologist, or other professional shall, prior to
105 examination, explain to the respondent in simple language,
106 the following:
107 (1) That the purpose of the examination is to produce
108 evidence which may be used to determine whether the
109 respondent is incapacitated, disabled, partially
110 incapacitated, or partially disabled;
111 (2) That respondent has the right to remain silent;
112 (3) That anything respondent says may be used at the
113 court hearing, and in making the determination of incapacity
114 or disability.
115 [7.] 8. The court-appointed physician, licensed
116 psychologist, or other professional shall submit a report in
117 writing to the court and to counsel for all parties. It
118 shall not be a valid objection to the review of the report
119 by the court or the attorneys for the parties that the court
120 will be responsible for the ultimate determination of
121 incapacity or partial incapacity. If other objections to
122 the report are made by any party, the court may order a
123 hearing for the limited purpose of determining whether the
124 court shall admit the report. The court may allow a
125 reasonable fee for the services rendered by the physician,
126 licensed psychologist, or other professional to be taxed as
127 costs in the proceeding.
128 [8.] 9. If prima facie proof of partial or complete
129 incapacity or disability, with or without the court-ordered
130 evaluation as provided in subsections [6 and] 7 and 8 of
131 this section, is made upon motion by any party or the court
132 on its own motion, a physician, licensed psychologist, or
133 other appropriate professional is competent and may be

SB 1317 27
134 compelled by the court to testify as to information acquired
135 from the respondent, despite otherwise applicable
136 testimonial privileges. Evidence received under this
137 subsection that would otherwise be privileged and
138 confidential may not be used in any other civil action or
139 criminal proceeding without the consent of the holder of the
140 privilege. Any resulting report shall be shared with the
141 respondent and counsel for all parties but shall not be used
142 in any other civil action or criminal proceeding without the
143 consent of the holder of the privilege.
144 [9.] 10. The petitioner has the burden of proving
145 incapacity, partial incapacity, disability, or partial
146 disability by clear and convincing evidence.
147 [10.] 11. The respondent shall have the following
148 rights in addition to those elsewhere specified and shall be
149 advised of these rights by the attorney for the respondent:
150 (1) The right to be represented by an attorney;
151 (2) The right to have a jury trial;
152 (3) The right to present evidence in the respondent's
153 behalf;
154 (4) The right to cross-examine witnesses who testify
155 against the respondent;
156 (5) The right to remain silent;
157 (6) The right to have the hearing opened or closed to
158 the public as the respondent elects;
159 (7) The right to a hearing conducted in accordance
160 with the rules of evidence in civil proceedings, except as
161 modified by this chapter;
162 (8) The right to be present at the hearing;
163 (9) The right to appeal the court's decision.
164 [11.] 12. If the court finds that the respondent
165 possesses capacity to manage the respondent's essential

SB 1317 28
166 requirements for food, clothing, shelter, safety, and other
167 care or that the respondent possesses the ability to manage
168 the respondent's financial resources, the court shall deny
169 the petition. On the other hand, if the court finds that
170 the capacity of the respondent to receive and evaluate
171 information or to communicate decisions is impaired to such
172 an extent as to render the respondent incapable of managing
173 some or all of the respondent's essential requirements for
174 food, clothing, shelter, safety or other care so that
175 serious physical injury, illness, or disease is likely to
176 occur, or that the capacity of the respondent to receive and
177 evaluate information or to communicate decisions is impaired
178 to such an extent so as to render the respondent unable to
179 manage some or all of the respondent's financial resources,
180 the court shall appoint a guardian or limited guardian, a
181 conservator or limited conservator, or both in combination.
182 [12.] 13. If the court finds the respondent to be in
183 some degree incapacitated or disabled, or both, the court,
184 in determining the degree of supervision necessary, shall
185 apply the least restrictive alternative principle as defined
186 in this chapter and shall not restrict the respondent's
187 personal liberty or the respondent's freedom to manage the
188 respondent's financial resources to any greater extent than
189 is necessary to protect the respondent's person and the
190 respondent's financial resources. The limitations imposed
191 upon the authority of the guardian or conservator as set
192 forth in the findings of the court shall be stated in the
193 letters of the guardian or conservator and shall be set
194 forth in the notice of first publication of letters of
195 conservatorship granted.
196 [13.] 14. Before appointing a guardian or conservator,
197 the court shall consider whether the respondent's needs may

SB 1317 29
198 be met without the necessity of the appointment of a
199 guardian or conservator, or both, by a less restrictive
200 alternative including, but not limited to, the following:
201 (1) Evidence that the respondent has appointed an
202 attorney-in-fact in a durable power of attorney executed by
203 the respondent before the petition was filed;
204 (2) The management of the beneficial interests of the
205 respondent in a trust by a trustee;
206 (3) Evidence that a representative payee has been
207 appointed to manage the respondent's public benefits;
208 (4) Supported decision-making agreements or the
209 provision of protective or supportive services or
210 arrangements provided by individuals or public or private
211 services or agencies;
212 (5) The use of appropriate services or assistive
213 technology;
214 (6) The appointment of a temporary emergency guardian
215 ad litem or conservator ad litem under subsection [15] 16 of
216 this section; or
217 (7) The appointment of a limited guardian or
218 conservator.
219 [14.] 15. The court shall make and recite in its order
220 detailed findings of fact stating:
221 (1) The extent of the respondent's physical, mental,
222 and cognitive incapacity to manage essential requirements
223 for food, clothing, shelter, safety, or other care;
224 (2) The extent of the respondent's physical, mental,
225 and cognitive incapacity to manage the respondent's
226 financial resources;
227 (3) Whether the respondent requires placement in a
228 supervised living situation and, if so, the degree of
229 supervision needed;

SB 1317 30
230 (4) Whether the respondent's financial resources
231 require supervision and, if so, the nature and extent of
232 supervision needed;
233 (5) Whether the respondent retains the right to vote;
234 (6) Whether the respondent is permitted to drive a
235 motor vehicle if the respondent can pass the required
236 driving test; and
237 (7) Whether the respondent retains the right to marry.
238 [15.] 16. If it is alleged in a petition that an
239 alleged incapacitated or disabled respondent has no guardian
240 or conservator and an emergency exists that presents a
241 substantial risk that serious physical harm will occur to
242 the respondent's person or irreparable damage will occur to
243 the respondent's property because of the respondent's
244 failure or inability to provide for the respondent's
245 essential human needs or to protect the respondent's
246 property, the court may, with notice to such person's
247 attorney, as provided in subsection [4] 5 of this section,
248 and service of notice upon such person as provided in
249 subsection 2 of this section, and, with or without notice to
250 other persons interested in the proceeding, after hearing,
251 appoint an emergency guardian ad litem or conservator ad
252 litem for a specified period not to exceed ninety days and
253 for specified purposes. Except for good cause shown, the
254 court shall hold a hearing on petitions filed under this
255 section within five business days of the filing of the
256 petition. Orders appointing the guardian or conservator ad
257 litem may be modified upon motion and hearing. Only after a
258 hearing and a showing of continuing emergency need, the
259 court may order the extension of the appointment of an
260 emergency guardian ad litem or conservator ad litem from
261 time to time, not to exceed ninety days each. A guardian ad

SB 1317 31
262 litem or conservator ad litem may be removed at any time and
263 shall make any report the court requires. Proceedings under
264 this subsection shall not be employed as alternative to
265 proceedings for the involuntary detention and treatment of a
266 mentally ill person under the provisions of chapter 632. If
267 no petition for guardianship, conservatorship, limited
268 guardianship, or limited conservatorship has been filed
269 within the first ninety days following the granting of
270 emergency authority under this section, the court may
271 terminate the authority granted under the emergency letters
272 upon motion of the attorney for the respondent and a finding
273 that doing so would not be manifestly contrary to the
274 respondent's interest.
475.079. 1. If it appears to the court or if it is
found by the jury or the court upon proof by clear and
convincing evidence that the person for whom a guardian is
sought is incapacitated as defined in this law and that the
respondent's identified needs cannot be met by a less
restrictive alternative, the court may appoint a guardian of
the person.
2. If it is found that the person for whom a
conservator of the estate is sought is a minor or is
disabled as defined in section 475.010 by a disability other
than or in addition to minority and that the respondent's
identified needs cannot be met by a less restrictive
alternative, the court may appoint a conservator of the
estate, who may be the same person appointed guardian of the
person.
3. The court shall not appoint the public
administrator to serve as guardian, limited guardian,
conservator, limited conservator, emergency guardian,
emergency conservator, guardian ad litem, or conservator ad

SB 1317 32
litem unless notice is first given to the public
administrator as provided in subsection 3 of section 475.075
and the public administrator has an opportunity to
participate in any hearing on such matter, including the
right to cross examine witnesses and to offer witnesses and
evidence. The public administrator may waive notice and the
opportunity to participate.
4. The court shall not appoint the division of
probation and parole to serve in a forensic guardianship
unless notice is first given to the division of probation
and parole as provided in subsection 4 of section 475.075
and the division of probation and parole has an opportunity
to participate in any hearing on such matter, including the
right to cross examine witnesses and to offer witnesses and
evidence. The division of probation and parole may waive
notice and the opportunity to participate.
475.120. 1. The guardian of the person of a minor
shall be entitled to the custody and control of the ward and
shall provide for the ward's education, support, and
maintenance.
2. A guardian or limited guardian of an incapacitated
person shall act in the best interest of the ward. A
limited guardian of an incapacitated person shall have the
powers and duties enumerated by the court in the
adjudication order or any later modifying order.
3. Except as otherwise limited by the court, a
guardian shall make decisions regarding the adult ward's
support, care, education, health, and welfare. A guardian
shall exercise authority only as necessitated by the adult
ward's limitations and, to the extent possible, shall
encourage the adult ward to participate in decisions, act on
the adult ward's own behalf, and develop or regain the

SB 1317 33
capacity to manage the adult ward's personal affairs. The
general powers and duties of a guardian of an incapacitated
person shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Assure that the ward resides in the best and least
restrictive setting reasonably available;
(2) Assure that the ward receives medical care and
other services that are needed;
(3) Promote and protect the care, comfort, safety,
health, and welfare of the ward;
(4) Provide required consents on behalf of the ward;
(5) To exercise all powers and discharge all duties
necessary or proper to implement the provisions of this
section.
4. A guardian of an adult or minor ward is not
obligated by virtue of such guardian's appointment to use
the guardian's own financial resources for the support of
the ward. If the ward's estate and available public
benefits are inadequate for the proper care of the ward, the
guardian or conservator may apply to the county commission
pursuant to section 475.370.
5. No guardian of the person shall have authority to
seek admission of the guardian's ward to a mental health or
intellectual disability facility for more than thirty days
for any purpose without court order except as otherwise
provided by law.
6. Only the director or chief administrative officer
of a social service agency serving as guardian of an
incapacitated person, or such person's designee, is legally
authorized to act on behalf of the ward.
7. A social service agency serving as guardian of an
incapacitated person shall notify the court within fifteen
days after any change in the identity of the professional

SB 1317 34
individual who has primary responsibility for providing
guardianship services to the incapacitated person.
8. Any social service agency serving as guardian may
not provide other services to the ward.
9. In the absence of any written direction from the
ward to the contrary, a guardian may execute a preneed
contract for the ward's funeral services, including
cremation, or an irrevocable life insurance policy to pay
for the ward's funeral services, including cremation, and
authorize the payment of such services from the ward's
resources. Nothing in this section shall interfere with the
rights of next-of-kin to direct the disposition of the body
of the ward upon death under section 194.119. If a preneed
arrangement such as that authorized by this subsection is in
place and no next-of-kin exercises the right of sepulcher
within ten days of the death of the ward, the guardian may
sign consents for the disposition of the body, including
cremation, without any liability therefor. A guardian who
exercises the authority granted in this subsection shall not
be personally financially responsible for the payment of
services.
10. A forensic guardianship shall operate in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
✓